California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
Upon request of the board, supported by a statement of its plans and projects approved by the Governor, the committee shall determine whether to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry out the board’s plans and projects, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out these plans and projects progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds be issued or sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.609.

(a) As long as any bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall, at the close of each fiscal year, require a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of each survey and projection shall be reported in writing by the public accountant to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and the committee.

(b) The Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the public accountant for these services out of
 any money that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.610.

(a) The committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds authorized by this article at the time or times established by the Treasurer.

(b) Whenever the committee deems it necessary for an effective sale of the bonds, the committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell any issue of bonds at less than their par value, notwithstanding Section 16754 of the Government Code. However, the discount on the bonds shall not exceed 3 percent of the par value thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.611.

Out of the first money realized from the sale of bonds as provided herein, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund, established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, the amount of all expenditures made for the purposes specified in that section, and this money may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional bond sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.612.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this article may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The approval of the voters for the issuance of bonds under this article includes approval for the issuance of bonds issued to refund bonds originally issued or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.613.

Notwithstanding any provision of the bond act, if the Treasurer sells bonds under this article for which bond counsel has issued an opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excludable from gross income for purposes of federal income tax, subject to any conditions which may be designated, the Treasurer may establish separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the earnings on those proceeds, and may use those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required by federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds required or permitted under federal law necessary to maintain the tax-exempt status of the bonds or to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

998.614.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this article are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by Article XIIIB.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 365, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 6, 2018, election; effective November 7, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Disabled Veterans Participation Goals for Professional Bond Services and State Contracts [999. - 999.13.]

999.

(a) This article shall be known as, and may be cited as, the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program. The California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program is established to address the special needs of disabled veterans seeking rehabilitation and training through entrepreneurship and to recognize the sacrifices of Californians disabled during military service. It is the intent of the Legislature that every state procurement authority honor California’s disabled veterans by taking all practical actions necessary to meet or exceed the disabled veteran business enterprise participation goal of a minimum of 3 percent of total contract value.

(b) As used in this
 article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Administering agency” means the Treasurer, in the case of contracts for professional bond services, and the Department of General Services’ Office of Small Business and Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Services, in the case of contracts governed by Section 999.2.

(2) “Awarding department” means a state agency, department, governmental entity, or other officer or entity empowered by law to issue bonds or enter into contracts on behalf of the state.

(3) “Bonds” means bonds, notes, warrants, certificates of participation, and other evidences of indebtedness issued by, or on behalf of, the state.

(4) “Contract”
 includes any agreement or joint agreement to provide professional bond services to the State of California or an awarding department. “Contract” also includes any agreement or joint development agreement to provide labor, services, materials, supplies, or equipment in the performance of a contract, franchise, concession, or lease granted, let, or awarded for, and on behalf of, the state.

(5) (A) “Contractor” means a person or persons, regardless of race, color, creed, national origin, ancestry, sex, marital status, disability, religious or political affiliation, age, or any sole proprietorship, firm, partnership, joint venture, corporation, or combination
 thereof that submits a bid and enters into a contract with a representative of a state agency, department, governmental entity, or other officer empowered by law to enter into contracts on behalf of the state. “Contractor” includes a provider of professional bond services who enters into a contract with an awarding department.

(B) “Disabled veteran business enterprise contractor, subcontractor, or supplier” means a person or entity that has been certified by the administering agency pursuant to
 this article and that performs a commercially useful function, as defined in clause (i), in providing services or goods that contribute to the fulfillment of the contract requirements:

(i) A person or an entity is deemed to perform a “commercially useful function” if a person or entity does all of the
 following:

(I) Is responsible for the execution of a distinct element of the work of the contract.

(II) Carries out the obligation by actually performing, managing, or supervising the work involved.

(III) Performs work that is normal for its business services and functions.

(IV) Is responsible, with respect to products, inventories, materials, and supplies required for the contract, for negotiating price, determining quality and quantity, ordering, installing, if applicable, and making payment.

(V) Is not further subcontracting a portion of the work that is greater than that expected to be
 subcontracted by normal industry practices.

(ii) A contractor, subcontractor, or supplier will not be considered to perform a commercially useful function if the contractor’s, subcontractor’s, or supplier’s role is limited to that of an extra participant in a transaction, contract, or project through which funds are passed in order to obtain the appearance of a disabled veteran business enterprise participation.

(6) “Disabled veteran” means a veteran of the military, naval, or air service of the United States, including, but not limited to, the Philippine Commonwealth Army, the Regular Scouts, “Old Scouts,” and the Special Philippine Scouts, “New Scouts,” who has at least a 10-percent service-connected disability and who is domiciled in the state.

(7) (A) “Disabled veteran business enterprise” means a business certified by the administering agency as meeting all of the following requirements:

(i) It is a sole proprietorship at least 51 percent owned by one or more disabled veterans or, in the case of a publicly owned business, at least 51 percent of its stock is unconditionally owned by one or more disabled veterans; a subsidiary that is wholly owned by
 a parent corporation, but only if at least 51 percent of the voting stock of the parent corporation is unconditionally owned by one or more disabled veterans; or a joint venture in which at least 51 percent of the joint venture’s management, control, and earnings are held by one or more disabled veterans.

(ii) The management and control of the daily business operations are by one or more disabled veterans. The disabled veterans who exercise management and control are not required to be the same disabled veterans as the owners of the business.

(iii) It is a sole proprietorship, corporation, or partnership with its home office located in the United States, which is not a branch or subsidiary of a foreign corporation, foreign firm, or other foreign-based business.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), after the death or the certification of a permanent medical disability of a disabled veteran who is a majority owner of a business that qualified as a disabled veteran business enterprise prior to that death or certification of a permanent medical disability, that business shall be deemed to be a disabled veteran business enterprise for a period not to exceed three years after the date of that death or certification of a permanent medical disability, if the business is inherited or controlled by the spouse or child of the majority owner, or by both of those persons. A business is a disabled veteran business enterprise pursuant to
 this subparagraph under either of the following circumstances:

(i) For the duration of any contract entered into prior to the death or certification of permanent medical disability for the sole purpose of fulfilling the requirements of that contract.

(ii) After the date of the majority owner’s death or certification of permanent medical disability established by this subparagraph for the sole purpose of providing sufficient time to make orderly and equitable arrangements for the disposition of the business, except that the business shall not enter into any new contract as a disabled veteran business enterprise for purposes of the program if the contract would not be completed within the three-year period.

(8) “Foreign
 corporation,” “foreign firm,” or “foreign-based business” means a business entity that is incorporated or has its principal headquarters located outside the United States of America.

(9) “Goal” means a numerically expressed objective that awarding departments and contractors are required to make efforts to achieve.

(10) “Management and control” means effective and demonstrable management of the business entity.

(11) “Professional bond services” include services as financial advisers, bond counsel, underwriters in negotiated transactions, underwriter’s counsel, financial printers, feasibility consultants, and other professional services related to the issuance and sale of bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 513, Sec. 2.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

999.1.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each awarding department shall have annual statewide participation goals of not less than 3 percent for disabled veteran business enterprises for contracts entered into by the awarding department during the year for professional bond services. This section shall not apply if a contract for professional bond services of an underwriter is to be obtained by competitive bid. However, each awarding department shall establish goals for contracts to be obtained by competitive bid for professional bond services.

(2) These goals shall apply to the overall dollar amount expended by the awarding department with respect to the contracts for professional bond services relating to the issuance of bonds by the awarding department, including amounts spent as underwriter’s discounts.

(b) In attempting to meet the goals set forth in subdivision (a), the awarding department shall consider establishing cocounsel, joint venture, and subcontracting relationships, including disabled veteran business enterprises, in all contracts for professional bond services. It shall be the responsibility of the head of each awarding department to be supportive of the Treasurer’s program for assigning representative portions of professional bond services contracts for purposes of meeting the goals established pursuant to this section. However, nothing in this article shall preclude the awarding department from achieving the goals set forth in this section without
 requiring joint ventures, cocounsel, or subcontracting arrangements.

(c) This section shall not limit the ability of any awarding department to meet a goal higher than those set forth in subdivision (a) for the participation of disabled veteran business enterprises in contracts awarded by the awarding department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1207, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

999.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts awarded by any state agency, department, officer, or other state governmental entity, including school districts when they are expending state funds for construction, professional services (except those subject to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16850) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), materials, supplies, equipment, alteration, repair, or improvement shall have statewide participation goals of not less than 3 percent for disabled veteran business enterprises. These goals apply to the overall dollar amount expended each year by the awarding department.

(b) For purposes
 of this section:

(1) “Broker” or “agent” means any individual or entity, or any combination thereof, that does not have title, possession, control, and risk of loss of materials, supplies, services, or equipment provided to an awarding department, unless one or more certified disabled veterans has 51 percent ownership of the quantity and value of the materials, supplies, services, and of each piece of equipment provided under the contract.

(2) “Equipment” means any piece of equipment that is used or provided for rental to any state agency, department, officer, or other state governmental entity, including equipment for which operators are provided.

(3) “Equipment broker” means any broker or agent who rents equipment
 to an awarding department.

(c) A disabled veteran business enterprise that rents equipment to an awarding department shall be deemed to be an equipment broker unless one or more disabled veterans has 51-percent ownership of the quantity and the value of each piece of equipment. If the equipment is owned by one or more disabled veterans, each disabled veteran owner shall, prior to performance under any contract, submit to the awarding department a declaration signed by the disabled veteran owner stating that the owner is a disabled veteran and providing the name, address, telephone number, and tax identification number of the disabled veteran owner. Each disabled veteran owner shall submit their federal income tax returns to the administering agency pursuant to subdivision (g)
 as if they were a disabled veteran business enterprise. The disabled veteran business enterprise of a disabled veteran owner who fails to submit their tax returns will be deemed to be an equipment broker.

(d) A disabled veteran business enterprise that rents equipment to an awarding department shall, prior to performing the contract, submit to the awarding department a declaration signed by each disabled veteran owner and manager of the enterprise stating that the enterprise obtained the contract by representing that the enterprise was a disabled veteran business enterprise meeting and maintaining all of the requirements of a disabled veteran business enterprise. The declaration shall include the name, address, telephone number, and tax identification number of the owner of each piece of equipment identified in the
 contract.

(e) State funds expended for equipment rented from equipment brokers pursuant to contracts awarded under this section shall not be credited toward the 3-percent goal.

(f) A disabled veteran business enterprise that is a broker or agent and that obtains a contract pursuant to subdivision (a) shall, prior to performing the contract, disclose to the awarding department that the business is a broker or agent. The disclosure shall be made in a declaration signed and executed by each disabled veteran owner and manager of the enterprise, declaring that the enterprise is a broker or agent, and identifying the name, address, and telephone number of the principal for whom the enterprise is acting as a broker or agent.

(g) (1) A disabled veteran business enterprise, and each owner thereof, shall, at the time of certification, submit to the administering agency complete copies of the enterprise’s federal income tax returns for the three previous tax years.

(2) A disabled veteran business enterprise, and each owner thereof, shall submit to the administering agency complete copies of the enterprise’s federal income tax returns that have a postcertification due date, on or before the due date, including extensions.

(3) A disabled veteran business enterprise that, and each owner thereof who, has not submitted to the administering agency complete copies of the enterprise’s federal income tax returns for the three tax years preceding certification nor for each postcertification
 tax year for which a return was required to be filed, shall have 90 days to submit those returns.

(4) A disabled veteran business enterprise that fails to comply with any provision of this subdivision shall be prohibited from participating in any state contract until the disabled veteran business enterprise complies with the provisions of this subdivision. Funds expended involving a disabled veteran business enterprise during any period in which that enterprise is not in compliance with the provisions of this subdivision shall not be credited toward the awarding department’s 3-percent goal.

(h) A disabled veteran business enterprise that fails to maintain the certification requirements set forth in this article shall immediately notify the awarding department and the administering agency
 of that failure by filing a notice of failure that states with particularity each requirement the disabled veteran business enterprise has failed to maintain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 95.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

999.3.

Notwithstanding Section 999.1, if a contract for professional bond services of an underwriter is to be obtained by competitive bid, the awarding department shall, at a minimum, take all of the following actions:

(a) Deliver the notice of sale or other notification of intention to issue the bonds to all disabled veteran business enterprises that have listed their names with the awarding department for the purpose of this notice and other qualified disabled veteran enterprises known to the awarding department.

(b) State in all
 notices of sale and other notifications of intention to issue bonds that disabled veteran business enterprises are encouraged to respond.

(c) Require all submitting bidders to certify their awareness of the goals of the awarding department in accordance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1207, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

999.5.

(a) The administering agency for the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program is the Department of General Services, except in the case of contracts for professional bond services. The Department of General Services shall consult with the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program Advocate, appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Veterans Affairs pursuant to Section 999.11, on all matters relating to the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program. The Director of General Services shall adopt written policies and guidelines establishing a uniform process for state contracting that would provide a disabled veteran business enterprise participation incentive to bidders. The incentive program shall be used
 by all state agencies when awarding contracts.

(b) The Department of Veterans Affairs shall do all of the following, as further described in Section 999.11:

(1) Establish a method of monitoring adherence to the goals specified in Sections 999.1 and 999.2.

(2) Promote the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program to the fullest extent possible.

(3) Maintain complete records of its promotional efforts.

(4) Establish a system to track the effectiveness of its efforts to promote the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program, which shall include regular, periodic surveys of newly certified
 disabled veteran business enterprises to determine how they learned of the program, why they became certified, and what their experience with awarding departments has been.

(c) An awarding department shall not credit toward the department’s 3-percent goal state funds expended on a contract with a disabled veteran business enterprise that is not certified at the time of the award or does not meet and maintain the certification requirements.

(d) Upon completion of an awarded contract for which a commitment to achieve a disabled veteran business enterprise goal was made, an awarding department shall require the prime contractor that entered into a subcontract with a disabled veteran business enterprise to certify to the awarding department all of the following:

(1) The total amount the prime contractor received under the contract.

(2) The name and address of the disabled veteran business enterprise that participated in the performance of the contract and the contract number.

(3) The amount and percentage of work the prime contractor committed to provide to one or more disabled veteran business enterprises under the requirements of the contract and the amount each disabled veteran business enterprise received from the prime contractor.

(4) That all payments under the contract have been made to the disabled veteran business enterprise. Upon request by the awarding department, the prime contractor shall provide proof of
 payment for the work.

(e) An awarding department shall keep the certification required pursuant to subdivision (d) on file.

(f) A person or entity that knowingly provides false information shall be subject to a civil penalty for each violation in the minimum amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and the maximum amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). An action for a civil penalty under this subdivision may be brought by any public prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California and the penalty imposed shall be enforceable as a civil judgment.

(g) After being awarded a contract, the prime contractor shall use the disabled veteran business enterprise subcontractors or suppliers
 proposed in the bid or proposal to the state unless a substitution is requested and approved. The prime contractor shall request the substitution in writing to the awarding department and receive approval from both the awarding department and the Department of General Services in writing prior to the commencement of any work by the proposed subcontractor or supplier. A substitution pursuant to this subdivision shall additionally comply with regulations adopted by the Department of General Services.

(h) The administering agency shall adopt rules and regulations for the purpose of implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 756, Sec. 13.   (AB 1574)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

999.55.

An awarding department shall maintain all records of the information provided by the prime contractor pursuant to Section 999.5 and shall establish appropriate review procedures for those records to ensure the accuracy and completeness of the award amounts and paid amounts reported. The records shall be maintained in a manner that facilitates access and review by external auditors. Records collected pursuant to this section shall be retained for a minimum of six years after collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 689, Sec. 1.   (AB 1365)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

999.6.

In implementing this article, the awarding department shall utilize existing resources such as the Office of Small Business and Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Services, the Department of Veterans Affairs, the federal Department of Veterans Affairs, and the Small Business Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 623, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

999.7.

(a) The awarding department shall withhold, on a contract entered into on or after January 1, 2021, ten thousand dollars ($10,000) from the final payment, or the full final payment if less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), until a prime contractor complies with the certification requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 999.5. A prime contractor that fails to comply with the certification requirement shall, after notice, be allowed to cure the defect. Notwithstanding any other law, if, after at least 15 calendar days but not more than 30
 calendar days from the date of notice, the prime contractor refuses to comply with the certification requirements, the awarding department shall permanently deduct ten thousand dollars ($10,000) from the final payment, or the full payment if less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). For contracts awarded for use by multiple state agencies, the Department of General Services may prescribe additional or alternative mechanisms for enforcing the certification requirement.

(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2024, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall complete a comprehensive assessment of the disabled veteran business enterprise program and submit a
 report to the Legislature. All other state entities shall assist the Legislative Analyst’s Office in completing its assessment to the greatest extent practicable.

(2) The report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to:

(A) Reports of noncompliance with the requirements of the disabled veteran enterprise program.

(B) Whether the Department of General Services is tracking complaints of abuse of the program, and information about those complaints, if available, including the type of abuse, how it was reported or discovered, dates that specific actions were taken on the case, and preventive measures taken by awarding departments.

(C) Whether the awarding departments notified disabled veteran business enterprise subcontractors when they were named on an awarded contract.

(D) Whether prime contractors received approval by the Department of General Services to replace a disabled veteran business enterprise subcontractor identified by the prime contractor in its bid or offer.

(E) Whether withholding payments have deterred prime contractors from failing to provide accurate certifications.

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, an awarding department shall not withhold more than the amount specified in subdivision (a) on the final payment of any disabled veteran business enterprise contract for the purposes of ensuring compliance with the certification requirements
 of subdivision (d) of Section 999.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 80, Sec. 2.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

999.8.

(a) Notwithstanding anything in this article to the contrary, the validity or enforceability of any bonds, or any contract or any notes, or other obligations issued by the awarding department to provide for the payment of any contract subject to this article shall not be affected in any way by the failure of an awarding department to meet the goals established under this article.

(b) No action may be maintained to enjoin the issuance of any bonds to which this article applies or the enforcement of any contract for professional bond services based on an awarding
 department’s failure to meet the goals set forth in Section 999.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1207, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

999.9.

(a) It shall be unlawful for a person to:

(1) Knowingly and with intent to defraud, fraudulently obtain, retain, attempt to obtain or retain, or aid another in fraudulently obtaining or retaining or attempting to obtain or retain, certification as a disabled veteran business enterprise for the purpose of this article.

(2) Willfully and knowingly make a false statement with the intent to defraud, whether by affidavit, report, or other representation, to a state official or employee for the purpose of influencing the certification or denial of certification of any entity as a disabled veteran business enterprise.

(3) Willfully and knowingly obstruct, impede, or attempt to obstruct or impede, any state official or employee who is investigating the qualifications of a business entity that has requested certification as a disabled veteran business enterprise.

(4) Knowingly and with intent to defraud, fraudulently obtain, attempt to obtain, or aid another person in fraudulently obtaining or attempting to obtain, public moneys, contracts, or funds expended under a contract, that are awarded by any state agency, department, officer, or other state governmental agency, to which the person is not entitled under this article.

(5) Knowingly and with intent to defraud, fraudulently represent participation of a disabled veteran business
 enterprise in order to obtain or retain a bid preference or a state contract.

(6) Knowingly and with intent to defraud, fraudulently represent that a commercially useful function is being performed by a disabled veteran business enterprise in order to obtain or retain a bid preference or a state contract.

(7) Willfully and knowingly make or subscribe to any statement, declaration, or other document that is fraudulent or false as to any material matter, whether or not that falsity or fraud is committed with the knowledge or consent of the person authorized or required to present the declaration, statement, or document.

(8) Willfully and knowingly aid or assist in, or procure, counsel, or advise, the preparation or
 presentation of a declaration, statement, or other document that is fraudulent or false as to any material matter, regardless of whether that falsity or fraud is committed with the knowledge or consent of the person authorized or required to present the declaration, statement, or document.

(9) Willfully and knowingly fail to file any declaration or notice with the awarding agency that is required by Section 999.2.

(10) Establish, or knowingly aid in the establishment of, or exercise control over, a firm found to have violated any of paragraphs (1) to (9), inclusive.

(b) A person who violates any of the provisions of subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding
 six months or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both. In addition, the person shall be liable for a civil penalty of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for the first violation, and a civil penalty of not less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each additional or subsequent violation. A defendant who violates any of the provisions of subdivision (a) shall pay all costs and attorney’s fees incurred by the plaintiff in a civil action brought pursuant to this section, including costs incurred by the awarding department and the Department of General Services.

(c) (1) The Department of General Services shall suspend any person who violates subdivision (a) from bidding on, or participating
 as either a contractor, subcontractor, or supplier in, any state contract or project for a period of not less than three years and not more than 10 years, and, if certified as a disabled veteran business enterprise, the department shall revoke the business’s certification, and the small business or microbusiness enterprise certification if the business has both certifications, for a period of not less than five years. An additional or subsequent violation shall extend the periods of suspension and revocation for a period of not less than 10 years. The suspension and revocation of certification shall apply to the principals of the business and any subsequent business formed or financed by, or affiliated with, one or more of those principals.

(2) A person that violates any of the provisions of subdivision (a) shall pay all costs incurred by the
 awarding department and the Department of General Services for any investigations that led to the finding of the violation. Costs incurred shall include, but are not limited to, costs and attorney’s fees paid by the department or the Department of General Services related to hearings and court appearances.

(3) The Department of General Services shall prohibit any business or person who fails to satisfy any of the penalties, costs, and attorney’s fees imposed pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) from further contracting with the state until all of the penalties, costs, and attorney’s fees are satisfied.

(d) In addition to the penalties imposed by this section, if a contractor is found to be in violation of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a), any existing contract between that
 contractor and any awarding department may be terminated at the discretion of the awarding department, and, where payment to the contractor is made directly by the state agency, the agency shall set off penalties and costs due to the state against any payments due to that contractor. In the event that the contracting state agency has forwarded the contract and invoices to the Controller for payment, the state agency shall reduce the amount due to the contractor as reflected in the claim schedule submitted to the Controller by the amount of the penalties and costs due the state. In addition, with regard to any penalties and costs due to the state that the state agency has not accounted for by either a set off against payments due to the contractor or a reduction reflected in the claim schedule submitted to the Controller, to the extent that the Controller is making payments to the contractor on
 behalf of any state agency, the Controller shall set off penalties and costs due against any invoices due to the contractor from any other contract awarded to the contractor.

(e) (1) The awarding department shall report all alleged violations of this section to the Department of General Services. After any review and investigation it deems necessary, the Department of General Services shall subsequently report all allegations that have sufficient grounds to the Attorney General who shall determine whether to bring a civil action against any person or firm for a violation of this section. However, the Department of General Services may pursue administrative action and administrative penalties irrespective of whether the Attorney General chooses to bring a civil action.

(2) (A) For alleged violations of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a), a civil action may be brought by any city attorney, county attorney or county counsel, district attorney, or the Attorney General in the name of the people of the State of California and the penalty imposed shall be enforceable as a civil judgment. A person who violates paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) shall be subject to civil penalties provided for in subdivision (b), including all costs and attorney’s fees incurred by the
 city attorney, county attorney or county counsel, district attorney, or the Attorney General and the costs incurred by the awarding department and the Department of General Services.

(B) A city attorney, county attorney or county counsel, or district attorney, shall not bring an action for a civil penalty under this paragraph if the Department of General Services has concluded an administrative action for the same violation. This subparagraph does not apply to a civil action brought by the Attorney General.

(C) In no event shall a monetary penalty be imposed through both an administrative action and a civil action for the same violation; however, the Department of General Services may impose any other penalty authorized by this section through an administrative action
 irrespective of the outcome of a civil action brought pursuant to this subparagraph.

(D) A city attorney, county attorney or county counsel, district attorney, and the Attorney General shall notify the Department of General Services before commencing an action under this paragraph.

(f) The Department of General Services shall monitor the status of all reported violations and shall maintain and make available to all state departments a central listing of all firms and persons who have been determined to have committed violations resulting in suspension.

(g) No awarding department shall enter into any contract with any person suspended for violating this section during the period of the person’s suspension. No
 awarding department shall award a contract to any contractor utilizing the services of any person as a subcontractor suspended for violating this section during the period of the person’s suspension.

(h) The awarding department shall check the central listing provided by the Department of General Services to verify that the person or contractor to whom the contract is being awarded, or any person being utilized as a subcontractor or supplier by that person or contractor, is not under suspension for violating this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 756, Sec. 14.   (AB 1574)   Effective January 1, 2022.)